Hawaii statutes.
§441-14 Dedication to cemetery purposes
does not violate laws against perpetuities. Dedication to cemetery
purposes pursuant to this chapter is not invalid as violating any laws against
perpetuities or the suspension of the power of alienation of title to or use of
property, but is expressly permitted and deemed to be in respect for the dead,
a provision for the interment of human remains, and a duty to and for the
benefit of the general public. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS §441-14]

Cross References

Uniform statutory rule against perpetuities, see chapter 525.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next